Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1911.03
Applicant; liability insurance.

(1) An applicant for a license under the Child Care Licensing Act shall provide to the department written proof of liability insurance coverage for the hours such applicant is operating and a child is in the applicant's care of at least one hundred thousand dollars per occurrence prior to issuance of the license.

(2) A licensee shall continue to maintain the required level of liability insurance for any time period during which a child is in the care of such licensee. Failure by a licensee to maintain the required level of liability insurance coverage shall be deemed noncompliance with the Child Care Licensing Act. If the licensee is the State of Nebraska or a political subdivision, the licensee may utilize a risk retention group or a risk management pool for purposes of providing such liability insurance coverage or may self-insure all or part of such coverage.

Laws 2013, LB105, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB874, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 24.